District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.15

Property delivered to owner preceding trial — Perishable property.

Perishable property, returned to the Property Clerk as the proceeds of crime, may be delivered to the owner on ample security being taken by the court for his appearance to prosecute the case.

R.S., D.C., § 421
This section is referenced in § 5-119.06.
1981 Ed., § 4-166.
1973 Ed., § 4-164.